Washington statutes.
RCW 15.04.410

Declarations of "Washington state grown"—Restrictions—Violations unlawful—Application of consumer protection act.

(1) Before being offered for retail sale in this state, any agricultural commodity, defined under RCW 15.66.010, that was grown or raised in this state may be advertised, labeled, described, sold, marked, or otherwise held out, with the words "Washington state grown," or other similar language indicating that the product is from Washington state grown or raised agricultural commodities.

(2) An agricultural commodity that was not grown or raised in this state and packages of that product shall not be advertised, labeled, described, sold, marked, or otherwise held out as "Washington state grown," or in any way as to imply that such product is a Washington state grown or raised agricultural commodity.

(3) It is unlawful for any person to violate this section.

(4) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Violations of this section are not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business. A violation of this section is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 1995 c 97 s 1.]